Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2259.01
Probation
Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) There
is hereby created the Probation Cash Fund. All money collected pursuant to
subdivisions (2)(m) and (2)(o) of section 29-2262 shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund.

(2) Expenditures from the money in the fund collected pursuant
to subdivisions (2)(m) and (2)(o) of section 29-2262 shall include, but not
be limited to, supplementing any state funds necessary to support the costs
of the services for which the money was collected.

(3) Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.

(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer any remaining
money in the fund collected pursuant to subdivisions (4)(a) and (4)(b) of
section 60-4,115 on January 1, 2012, to the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition
Interlock Fund.

Laws 1990, LB 220, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 25;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 20;

Laws 2001, Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB497, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 7.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.